incubator/apertium-lat/apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <!-- Declension 1 -->
    <pardef n="aqu/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Poetic">
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Older form">
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Corneli/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Poetic">
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Older form">
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Arde/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Poetic">
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Older form">
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bracc/ae__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="absentia"><i>absenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acta"><i>act</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agricultura"><i>agricultur</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alea"><i>ale</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amicitia"><i>amiciti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amitina"><i>amitin</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anima"><i>anim</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antenna"><i>antenn</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ara"><i>ar</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ardea"><i>arde</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arena"><i>aren</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arula"><i>arul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auricula"><i>auricul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baca"><i>bac</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bruma"><i>brum</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stella"><i>stell</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="Cornelia"><i>Corneli</i><par n="Corneli/a__np"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="abundantia"><i>abundanti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="adulescentia"><i>adulescenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="ambrosia"><i>ambrosi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="amphora"><i>amphor</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="ancillula"><i>ancillul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="annona"><i>annon</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="arena"><i>aren</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="aroma"><i>arom</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="audacia"><i>audaci</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="aula"><i>aul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="aurora"><i>auror</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="balaena"><i>balaen</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="benevolentia"><i>benevolenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="bestia"><i>besti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="caltha"><i>calth</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="capella"><i>capell</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="categoria"><i>categori</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="cauda"><i>caud</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="cella"><i>cell</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="cithara"><i>cithar</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="concubina"><i>concubin</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="controversia"><i>controversi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="culpa"><i>culp</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="dea"><i>de</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="discordia"><i>discordi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="ecclesia"><i>ecclesi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="fabella"><i>fabell</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="famula"><i>famul</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="forma"><i>form</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="gloria"><i>glori</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="ignavia"><i>ignavi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="iniuria"><i>iniuri</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="inperitia"><i>inperiti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="invidia"><i>invidi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="laetitia"><i>laetiti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="luna"><i>lun</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="materia"><i>materi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="memoria"><i>memori</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="misericordia"><i>misericordi</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="neglegentia"><i>neglegenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="ora"><i>or</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="pellicia"><i>pellici</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="pestilentia"><i>pestilenti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="plaga"><i>plag</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="prophetia"><i>propheti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="puelia"><i>pueli</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="regina"><i>regin</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="rota"><i>rot</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="sagitta"><i>sagitt</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="schola"><i>schol</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="silva"><i>silv</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="stilla"><i>still</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="substantia"><i>substanti</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="sylva"><i>sylv</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="tenebra"><i>tenebr</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="tunica"><i>tunic</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="uncia"><i>unci</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="ursa"><i>urs</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="victoria"><i>victori</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="afgl-lat" lm="vinea"><i>vine</i><par n="aqu/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ardea"><i>Arde</i><par n="Arde/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="braccae"><i>bracc</i><par n="bracc/ae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="thermae"><i>therm</i><par n="bracc/ae__n"/></e>
